Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2710.02
Economic development program; workforce housing plan; proposed plan; contents.

If the proposed economic development program involves the making of grants or loans for the construction or rehabilitation for sale or lease of housing as part of a workforce housing plan, the proposed plan shall include:

(1) An assessment of current housing stock in the city, including both single-family and market rate multi-family housing;

(2) Whether the plan will also include housing for persons of low or moderate income under section 18-2710.01;

(3) Such other factors, as determined by the city, which are particularly relevant in assessing the conditions faced by existing businesses in recruiting new employees; and

(4) Such other factors, as determined by the city, which are particularly relevant in assessing the conditions faced by persons seeking new or rehabilitated housing in the city.

Laws 2016, LB1059, § 6.